Illinois, session 104th, SB2852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3.197, 3.330, and 22.22 and by adding 6Sections 3.121, 3.122, 3.183, 3.198, 22.22a, 22.34, and 22.55 7as follows: 8    (415 ILCS 5/3.121 new)9    Sec. 3.121. Anaerobic digester. "Anaerobic digester" means 10a site or facility that treats the organic fraction of waste 11using anaerobic digestion. 12    (415 ILCS 5/3.122 new)13    Sec. 3.122. Anaerobic digestion. "Anaerobic digestion" 14means the biological treatment process by which microorganisms 15break down the organic fraction of waste in the absence of 16oxygen in an enclosed vessel to produce biogas and digestate. 17    (415 ILCS 5/3.183 new)18    Sec. 3.183. Digestate. "Digestate" means a solid, 19semi-solid, or liquid material remaining after anaerobic 20digestion of organic waste.   SB2852- 2 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    (415 ILCS 5/3.197)2    Sec. 3.197. Food waste scrap. "Food waste scrap" means 3garbage that is (i) capable of being decomposed into compost 4by composting, (ii) separated by the generator from other 5waste, including, but not limited to, garbage that is not 6capable of being decomposed into compost by composting, and 7(iii) managed separately from other waste, including, but not 8limited to, garbage that is not capable of being decomposed 9into compost by composting. "Food scrap" includes, but is not 10limited to, packaging, utensils, and food containers composed 11of readily biodegradable material. For the purposes of this 12Section, packaging, utensils, and food containers are readily 13biodegradable if they meet the ASTM D6400 standard.14(Source: P.A. 96-418, eff. 1-1-10.) 15    (415 ILCS 5/3.198 new)16    Sec. 3.198. Food waste processing facility. "Food waste 17processing facility" means an intermediate processing facility 18permitted by the Agency to accept food waste only for removal 19of food waste from its original packaging or for processing 20the food waste to make it suitable for either transporting to 21an Agency-permitted composting facility or anaerobic digester. 22    (415 ILCS 5/3.330)  (was 415 ILCS 5/3.32)23    Sec. 3.330. Pollution control facility. 24    (a) "Pollution control facility" is any waste storage   SB2852- 3 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1site, sanitary landfill, waste disposal site, waste transfer 2station, waste treatment facility, or waste incinerator. This 3includes sewers, sewage treatment plants, and any other 4facilities owned or operated by sanitary districts organized 5under the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act.6    The following are not pollution control facilities:7        (1) (blank);8        (2) waste storage sites regulated under 40 CFR 761.42;9        (3) sites or facilities used by any person conducting 10    a waste storage, waste treatment, waste disposal, waste 11    transfer or waste incineration operation, or a combination 12    thereof, for wastes generated by such person's own 13    activities, when such wastes are stored, treated, disposed 14    of, transferred or incinerated within the site or facility 15    owned, controlled or operated by such person, or when such 16    wastes are transported within or between sites or 17    facilities owned, controlled or operated by such person;18        (4) sites or facilities at which the State is 19    performing removal or remedial action pursuant to Section 20    22.2 or 55.3;21        (5) abandoned quarries used solely for the disposal of 22    concrete, earth materials, gravel, or aggregate debris 23    resulting from road construction activities conducted by a 24    unit of government or construction activities due to the 25    construction and installation of underground pipes, lines, 26    conduit or wires off of the premises of a public utility   SB2852- 4 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    company which are conducted by a public utility;2        (6) sites or facilities used by any person to 3    specifically conduct a landscape composting operation;4        (7) regional facilities as defined in the Central 5    Midwest Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact;6        (8) the portion of a site or facility where coal 7    combustion wastes are stored or disposed of in accordance 8    with subdivision (r)(2) or (r)(3) of Section 21;9        (9) the portion of a site or facility used for the 10    collection, storage or processing of waste tires as 11    defined in Title XIV;12        (10) the portion of a site or facility used for 13    treatment of petroleum contaminated materials by 14    application onto or incorporation into the soil surface 15    and any portion of that site or facility used for storage 16    of petroleum contaminated materials before treatment. Only 17    those categories of petroleum listed in Section 57.9(a)(3) 18    are exempt under this subdivision (10);19        (11) the portion of a site or facility where used oil 20    is collected or stored prior to shipment to a recycling or 21    energy recovery facility, provided that the used oil is 22    generated by households or commercial establishments, and 23    the site or facility is a recycling center or a business 24    where oil or gasoline is sold at retail;25        (11.5) processing sites or facilities that receive 26    only on-specification used oil, as defined in 35 Ill. Adm.   SB2852- 5 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    Code 739, originating from used oil collectors for 2    processing that is managed under 35 Ill. Adm. Code 739 to 3    produce products for sale to off-site petroleum 4    facilities, if these processing sites or facilities are: 5    (i) located within a home rule unit of local government 6    with a population of at least 30,000 according to the 2000 7    federal census, that home rule unit of local government 8    has been designated as an Urban Round II Empowerment Zone 9    by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 10    Development, and that home rule unit of local government 11    has enacted an ordinance approving the location of the 12    site or facility and provided funding for the site or 13    facility; and (ii) in compliance with all applicable 14    zoning requirements; 15        (12) the portion of a site or facility utilizing coal 16    combustion waste for stabilization and treatment of only 17    waste generated on that site or facility when used in 18    connection with response actions pursuant to the federal 19    Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and 20    Liability Act of 1980, the federal Resource Conservation 21    and Recovery Act of 1976, or the Illinois Environmental 22    Protection Act or as authorized by the Agency;23        (13) the portion of a site or facility regulated under 24    Section 22.38 of this Act;25        (14) the portion of a site or facility, located within 26    a unit of local government that has enacted local zoning   SB2852- 6 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    requirements, used to accept, separate, and process 2    uncontaminated broken concrete, with or without protruding 3    metal bars, provided that the uncontaminated broken 4    concrete and metal bars are not speculatively accumulated, 5    are at the site or facility no longer than one year after 6    their acceptance, and are returned to the economic 7    mainstream in the form of raw materials or products;8        (15) the portion of a site or facility located in a 9    county with a population over 3,000,000 that has obtained 10    local siting approval under Section 39.2 of this Act for a 11    municipal waste incinerator on or before July 1, 2005 and 12    that is used for a non-hazardous waste transfer station; 13        (16) a site or facility that temporarily holds in 14    transit for 10 days or less, non-putrescible solid waste 15    in original containers, no larger in capacity than 500 16    gallons, provided that such waste is further transferred 17    to a recycling, disposal, treatment, or storage facility 18    on a non-contiguous site and provided such site or 19    facility complies with the applicable 10-day transfer 20    requirements of the federal Resource Conservation and 21    Recovery Act of 1976 and United States Department of 22    Transportation hazardous material requirements. For 23    purposes of this Section only, "non-putrescible solid 24    waste" means waste other than municipal garbage that does 25    not rot or become putrid, including, but not limited to, 26    paints, solvent, filters, and absorbents;   SB2852- 7 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (17) the portion of a site or facility located in a 2    county with a population greater than 3,000,000 that has 3    obtained local siting approval, under Section 39.2 of this 4    Act, for a municipal waste incinerator on or before July 5    1, 2005 and that is used for wood combustion facilities 6    for energy recovery that accept and burn only wood 7    material, as included in a fuel specification approved by 8    the Agency; 9        (18) a transfer station used exclusively for landscape 10    waste, including a transfer station where landscape waste 11    is ground to reduce its volume, where the landscape waste 12    is held no longer than 24 hours from the time it was 13    received;14        (19) the portion of a site or facility that (i) is used 15    for the composting of food waste scrap, livestock waste, 16    crop residue, uncontaminated wood waste, or paper waste, 17    including, but not limited to, corrugated paper or 18    cardboard, and (ii) meets all of the following 19    requirements:20            (A) There must not be more than a total of 30,000 21        cubic yards of livestock waste in raw form or in the 22        process of being composted at the site or facility at 23        any one time.24            (B) All food waste food scrap, livestock waste, 25        crop residue, uncontaminated wood waste, and paper 26        waste must, by the end of each operating day, be   SB2852- 8 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        processed and placed into an enclosed vessel in which 2        air flow and temperature are controlled, or all of the 3        following additional requirements must be met:4                (i) The portion of the site or facility used 5            for the composting operation must include a 6            setback of at least 200 feet from the nearest 7            potable water supply well.8                (ii) The portion of the site or facility used 9            for the composting operation must be located 10            outside the boundary of the 10-year floodplain or 11            floodproofed.12                (iii) Except in municipalities with more than 13            1,000,000 inhabitants, the portion of the site or 14            facility used for the composting operation must be 15            located at least one-eighth of a mile from the 16            nearest residence, other than a residence located 17            on the same property as the site or facility.18                (iv) The portion of the site or facility used 19            for the composting operation must be located at 20            least one-eighth of a mile from the property line 21            of all of the following areas:22                    (I) Facilities that primarily serve to 23                house or treat people that are 24                immunocompromised or immunosuppressed, such as 25                cancer or AIDS patients; people with asthma, 26                cystic fibrosis, or bioaerosol allergies; or   SB2852- 9 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1                children under the age of one year.2                    (II) Primary and secondary schools and 3                adjacent areas that the schools use for 4                recreation.5                    (III) Any facility for child care licensed 6                under Section 3 of the Child Care Act of 1969; 7                preschools; and adjacent areas that the 8                facilities or preschools use for recreation.9                (v) By the end of each operating day, all food 10            waste food scrap, livestock waste, crop residue, 11            uncontaminated wood waste, and paper waste must be 12            (i) processed into windrows or other piles and 13            (ii) covered in a manner that prevents scavenging 14            by birds and animals and that prevents other 15            nuisances.16            (C) Food waste Food scrap, livestock waste, crop 17        residue, uncontaminated wood waste, paper waste, and 18        compost must not be placed within 5 feet of the water 19        table.20            (D) The site or facility must meet all of the 21        requirements of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 22        U.S.C. 1271 et seq.).23            (E) The site or facility must not (i) restrict the 24        flow of a 100-year flood, (ii) result in washout of 25        food waste food scrap, livestock waste, crop residue, 26        uncontaminated wood waste, or paper waste from a   SB2852- 10 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        100-year flood, or (iii) reduce the temporary water 2        storage capacity of the 100-year floodplain, unless 3        measures are undertaken to provide alternative storage 4        capacity, such as by providing lagoons, holding tanks, 5        or drainage around structures at the facility.6            (F) The site or facility must not be located in any 7        area where it may pose a threat of harm or destruction 8        to the features for which:9                (i) an irreplaceable historic or 10            archaeological site has been listed under the 11            National Historic Preservation Act (16 U.S.C. 470 12            et seq.) or the Illinois Historic Preservation 13            Act;14                (ii) a natural landmark has been designated by 15            the National Park Service or the Illinois State 16            Historic Preservation Office; or17                (iii) a natural area has been designated as a 18            Dedicated Illinois Nature Preserve under the 19            Illinois Natural Areas Preservation Act.20            (G) The site or facility must not be located in an 21        area where it may jeopardize the continued existence 22        of any designated endangered species, result in the 23        destruction or adverse modification of the critical 24        habitat for such species, or cause or contribute to 25        the taking of any endangered or threatened species of 26        plant, fish, or wildlife listed under the Endangered   SB2852- 11 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        Species Act (16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.) or the Illinois 2        Endangered Species Protection Act;3        (20) the portion of a site or facility that is located 4    entirely within a home rule unit having a population of no 5    less than 120,000 and no more than 135,000, according to 6    the 2000 federal census, and that meets all of the 7    following requirements:8            (i) the portion of the site or facility is used 9        exclusively to perform testing of a thermochemical 10        conversion technology using only woody biomass, 11        collected as landscape waste within the boundaries of 12        the home rule unit, as the hydrocarbon feedstock for 13        the production of synthetic gas in accordance with 14        Section 39.9 of this Act;15            (ii) the portion of the site or facility is in 16        compliance with all applicable zoning requirements; 17        and18            (iii) a complete application for a demonstration 19        permit at the portion of the site or facility has been 20        submitted to the Agency in accordance with Section 21        39.9 of this Act within one year after July 27, 2010 22        (the effective date of Public Act 96-1314);23        (21) the portion of a site or facility used to perform 24    limited testing of a gasification conversion technology in 25    accordance with Section 39.8 of this Act and for which a 26    complete permit application has been submitted to the   SB2852- 12 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    Agency prior to one year from April 9, 2010 (the effective 2    date of Public Act 96-887); 3        (22) the portion of a site or facility that is used to 4    incinerate only pharmaceuticals from residential sources 5    that are collected and transported by law enforcement 6    agencies under Section 17.9A of this Act; 7        (23) the portion of a site or facility: 8            (A) that is used exclusively for the transfer of 9        commingled landscape waste and food waste food scrap 10        held at the site or facility for no longer than 24 11        hours after their receipt;12            (B) that is located entirely within a home rule 13        unit having a population of (i) not less than 100,000 14        and not more than 115,000 according to the 2010 15        federal census, (ii) not less than 5,000 and not more 16        than 10,000 according to the 2010 federal census, or 17        (iii) not less than 25,000 and not more than 30,000 18        according to the 2010 federal census or that is 19        located in the unincorporated area of a county having 20        a population of not less than 700,000 and not more than 21        705,000 according to the 2010 federal census;22            (C) that is permitted, by the Agency, prior to 23        January 1, 2002, for the transfer of landscape waste 24        if located in a home rule unit or that is permitted 25        prior to January 1, 2008 if located in an 26        unincorporated area of a county; and  SB2852- 13 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1            (D) for which a permit application is submitted to 2        the Agency to modify an existing permit for the 3        transfer of landscape waste to also include, on a 4        demonstration basis not to exceed 24 months each time 5        a permit is issued, the transfer of commingled 6        landscape waste and food waste food scrap or for which 7        a permit application is submitted to the Agency within 8        6 months of August 11, 2017 (the effective date of 9        Public Act 100-94);10        (24) the portion of a municipal solid waste landfill 11    unit:12            (A) that is located in a county having a 13        population of not less than 55,000 and not more than 14        60,000 according to the 2010 federal census;15            (B) that is owned by that county;16            (C) that is permitted, by the Agency, prior to 17        July 10, 2015 (the effective date of Public Act 18        99-12); and19            (D) for which a permit application is submitted to 20        the Agency within 6 months after July 10, 2015 (the 21        effective date of Public Act 99-12) for the disposal 22        of non-hazardous special waste;23        (25) the portion of a site or facility used during a 24    mass animal mortality event, as defined in the Animal 25    Mortality Act, where such waste is collected, stored, 26    processed, disposed, or incinerated under a mass animal   SB2852- 14 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    mortality event plan issued by the Department of 2    Agriculture; and 3        (26) the portion of a mine used for the placement of 4    limestone residual materials generated from the treatment 5    of drinking water by a municipal utility in accordance 6    with rules adopted under Section 22.63; and . 7        (27) the portion of a site or facility that (i) is used 8    exclusively for the removal of food waste from its 9    original packaging or the processing of food waste to make 10    it suitable for transport to either a composting facility 11    or anaerobic digester and (ii) is located within the 12    permitted boundary of a waste-storage, waste-treatment, or 13    waste-disposal operation for which local siting approval 14    was granted pursuant to Section 39.2 of the Act or is 15    located within the permitted boundary of an 16    Agency-permitted composting facility or anaerobic 17    digester. 18    (b) A new pollution control facility is:19        (1) a pollution control facility initially permitted 20    for development or construction after July 1, 1981; or21        (2) the area of expansion beyond the boundary of a 22    currently permitted pollution control facility; or23        (3) a permitted pollution control facility requesting 24    approval to store, dispose of, transfer or incinerate, for 25    the first time, any special or hazardous waste.26(Source: P.A. 102-216, eff. 1-1-22; 102-310, eff. 8-6-21;   SB2852- 15 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-333, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (415 ILCS 5/22.22)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1022.22)3    Sec. 22.22. Landscape waste. 4    (a) Beginning July 1, 1990, no person may knowingly mix 5landscape waste that is intended for collection or for 6disposal at a landfill with any other municipal waste.7    (b) Beginning July 1, 1990, no person may knowingly put 8landscape waste into a container intended for collection or 9disposal at a landfill, unless such container is 10biodegradable.11    (c) Beginning July 1, 1990, no owner or operator of a 12sanitary landfill shall accept landscape waste for final 13disposal, except that landscape waste separated from municipal 14waste may be accepted by a sanitary landfill if (1) the 15landfill provides and maintains for that purpose separate 16landscape waste composting facilities and composts all 17landscape waste, and (2) the composted waste is utilized, by 18the operators of the landfill or by any other person, as part 19of the final vegetative cover for the landfill or for such 20other uses as soil conditioning material, or the landfill has 21received an Agency permit to use source separated and 22processed landscape waste as an alternative daily cover and 23the landscape waste is processed at a site, other than the 24sanitary landfill, that has received an Agency permit before 25July 30, 1997 to process landscape waste. For purposes of this   SB2852- 16 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1Section, (i) "source separated" means divided into its 2component parts at the point of generation and collected 3separately from other solid waste and (ii) "processed" means 4shredded by mechanical means to reduce the landscape waste to 5a uniform consistency.6    (d) The requirements of this Section shall not apply (i) 7to landscape waste collected as part of a municipal street 8sweeping operation where the intent is to provide street 9sweeping service rather than leaf collection, nor (ii) to 10landscape waste collected by bar screens or grates in a sewage 11treatment system.12    (e) The requirements of this Section shall not apply to 13the mixing or commingling of food waste and landscape waste if 14the commingled waste is directed to a location where it is 15managed in a manner consistent with the food waste management 16hierarchy described in subsection (a) of Section 11 of the 17Illinois Solid Waste Management Act.18(Source: P.A. 92-574, eff. 6-26-02.) 19    (415 ILCS 5/22.22a new)20    Sec. 22.22a. Anaerobic digester feedstock and digestate. 21An anaerobic digester shall only accept source-separated 22organic materials as feedstock and shall treat digestate, as 23needed, to be suitable as and used for soil amendment. 24    (415 ILCS 5/22.34)  SB2852- 17 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    Sec. 22.34. Organic waste compost quality standards. 2    (a) The Agency may develop and make recommendations to the 3Board concerning (i) performance standards for organic waste 4compost facilities and (ii) testing procedures and standards 5for the end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 6facilities.7    The Agency, in cooperation with the Department, shall 8appoint a Technical Advisory Committee for the purpose of 9developing these recommendations. Among other things, the 10Committee shall evaluate environmental and safety 11considerations, compliance costs, and regulations adopted in 12other states and countries. The Committee shall have balanced 13representation and shall include members representing 14academia, the composting industry, the Department of 15Agriculture, the landscaping industry, environmental 16organizations, municipalities, and counties.17    Performance standards for organic waste compost facilities 18may include, but are not limited to: 19        (1) the management of potential exposures for human 20    disease vectors and odor; 21        (2) the management of surface water; 22        (3) contingency planning for handling end-product 23    compost material that does not meet end-product compost 24    standards adopted by the Board; 25        (4) plans for intended purposes of end-use product; 26    and   SB2852- 18 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (5) a financial assurance plan necessary to restore 2    the site as specified in Agency permit. The financial 3    assurance plan may include, but is not limited to, posting 4    with the Agency a performance bond or other security for 5    the purpose of ensuring site restoration. 6    (b) No later than one year after the Agency makes 7recommendations to the Board under subsection (a) of this 8Section, the Board shall adopt, as applicable: 9        (1) performance standards for organic waste compost 10    facilities; and 11        (2) testing procedures and standards for the 12    end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 13    facilities.14    The Board shall evaluate the merits of different standards 15for end-product compost applications.16    (c) On-site residential composting that is used solely for 17the purpose of composting organic waste generated on-site and 18that will not be offered for off-site sale or use is exempt 19from any standards promulgated under subsections (a) and (b). 20Subsection (b)(2) shall not apply to end-product compost used 21as daily cover or vegetative amendment in the final layer. 22Subsection (b) applies to any end-product compost offered for 23sale or use in Illinois.24    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "organic waste" 25means food waste food scrap, landscape waste, wood waste, 26livestock waste, crop residue, paper waste, or other   SB2852- 19 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1non-hazardous carbonaceous waste that is collected and 2processed separately from the rest of the municipal waste 3stream.4    (e) Except as otherwise provided in Board rules, solid 5waste permits for organic waste composting facilities shall be 6issued under the Board's Solid Waste rules at 35 Ill. Adm. Code 7807. The permits must include, but shall not be limited to, 8measures designed to reduce pathogens in the compost. 9    (f) Standards adopted under this Section do not apply to 10compost operations exempt from permitting under paragraph 11(1.5) of subsection (q) of Section 21 of this Act. 12(Source: P.A. 98-239, eff. 8-9-13.) 13    (415 ILCS 5/22.55)14    Sec. 22.55. Household waste drop-off points. 15    (a) Findings; purpose and intent.16        (1) The General Assembly finds that protection of 17    human health and the environment can be enhanced if 18    certain commonly generated household wastes are managed 19    separately from the general household waste stream.20        (2) The purpose of this Section is to provide, to the 21    extent allowed under federal law, a method for managing 22    certain types of household waste separately from the 23    general household waste stream.24    (b) Definitions. For the purposes of this Section:25        "Compostable waste" means household waste that is   SB2852- 20 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    source-separated food waste food scrap, household waste 2    that is source-separated landscape waste, or a mixture of 3    both. 4        "Controlled substance" means a controlled substance as 5    defined in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 6        "Household waste" means waste generated from a single 7    residence or multiple residences.8        "Household waste drop-off point" means the portion of 9    a site or facility used solely for the receipt and 10    temporary storage of household waste.11        "One-day compostable waste collection event" means a 12    household waste drop-off point approved by a county or 13    municipality under subsection (d-5) of this Section. 14        "One-day household waste collection event" means a 15    household waste drop-off point approved by the Agency 16    under subsection (d) of this Section.17        "Permanent compostable waste collection point" means a 18    household waste drop-off point approved by a county or 19    municipality under subsection (d-6) of this Section. 20        "Personal care product" means an item other than a 21    pharmaceutical product that is consumed or applied by an 22    individual for personal health, hygiene, or cosmetic 23    reasons. Personal care products include, but are not 24    limited to, items used in bathing, dressing, or grooming.25        "Pharmaceutical product" means medicine or a product 26    containing medicine. A pharmaceutical product may be sold   SB2852- 21 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    by prescription or over the counter. "Pharmaceutical 2    product" does not include medicine that contains a 3    radioactive component or a product that contains a 4    radioactive component.5        "Recycling coordinator" means the person designated by 6    each county waste management plan to administer the county 7    recycling program, as set forth in the Solid Waste 8    Management Act. 9    (c) Except as otherwise provided in Agency rules, the 10following requirements apply to each household waste drop-off 11point, other than a one-day household waste collection event, 12one-day compostable waste collection event, or permanent 13compostable waste collection point:14        (1) A household waste drop-off point must not accept 15    waste other than the following types of household waste: 16    pharmaceutical products, personal care products, batteries 17    other than lead-acid batteries, paints, automotive fluids, 18    compact fluorescent lightbulbs, mercury thermometers, and 19    mercury thermostats. A household waste drop-off point may 20    accept controlled substances in accordance with federal 21    law.22        (2) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this 23    Section, household waste drop-off points must be located 24    at a site or facility where the types of products accepted 25    at the household waste drop-off point are lawfully sold, 26    distributed, or dispensed. For example, household waste   SB2852- 22 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    drop-off points that accept prescription pharmaceutical 2    products must be located at a site or facility where 3    prescription pharmaceutical products are sold, 4    distributed, or dispensed.5            (A) Subdivision (c)(2) of this Section does not 6        apply to household waste drop-off points operated by a 7        government or school entity, or by an association or 8        other organization of government or school entities.9            (B) Household waste drop-off points that accept 10        mercury thermometers can be located at any site or 11        facility where non-mercury thermometers are sold, 12        distributed, or dispensed.13            (C) Household waste drop-off points that accept 14        mercury thermostats can be located at any site or 15        facility where non-mercury thermostats are sold, 16        distributed, or dispensed.17        (3) The location of acceptance for each type of waste 18    accepted at the household waste drop-off point must be 19    clearly identified. Locations where pharmaceutical 20    products are accepted must also include a copy of the sign 21    required under subsection (j) of this Section.22        (4) Household waste must be accepted only from private 23    individuals. Waste must not be accepted from other 24    persons, including, but not limited to, owners and 25    operators of rented or leased residences where the 26    household waste was generated, commercial haulers, and   SB2852- 23 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    other commercial, industrial, agricultural, and government 2    operations or entities.3        (5) If more than one type of household waste is 4    accepted, each type of household waste must be managed 5    separately prior to its packaging for off-site transfer.6        (6) Household waste must not be stored for longer than 7    90 days after its receipt, except as otherwise approved by 8    the Agency in writing.9        (7) Household waste must be managed in a manner that 10    protects against releases of the waste, prevents 11    nuisances, and otherwise protects human health and the 12    environment. Household waste must also be properly secured 13    to prevent unauthorized public access to the waste, 14    including, but not limited to, preventing access to the 15    waste during the non-business hours of the site or 16    facility on which the household waste drop-off point is 17    located. Containers in which pharmaceutical products are 18    collected must be clearly marked "No Controlled 19    Substances", unless the household waste drop-off point 20    accepts controlled substances in accordance with federal 21    law.22        (8) Management of the household waste must be limited 23    to the following: (i) acceptance of the waste, (ii) 24    temporary storage of the waste prior to transfer, and 25    (iii) off-site transfer of the waste and packaging for 26    off-site transfer.  SB2852- 24 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (9) Off-site transfer of the household waste must 2    comply with federal and State laws and regulations.3    (d) One-day household waste collection events. To further 4aid in the collection of certain household wastes, the Agency 5may approve the operation of one-day household waste 6collection events. The Agency shall not approve a one-day 7household waste collection event at the same site or facility 8for more than one day each calendar quarter. Requests for 9approval must be submitted on forms prescribed by the Agency. 10The Agency must issue its approval in writing, and it may 11impose conditions as necessary to protect human health and the 12environment and to otherwise accomplish the purposes of this 13Act. One-day household waste collection events must be 14operated in accordance with the Agency's approval, including 15all conditions contained in the approval. The following 16requirements apply to all one-day household waste collection 17events, in addition to the conditions contained in the 18Agency's approval:19        (1) Waste accepted at the event must be limited to 20    household waste and must not include garbage, landscape 21    waste, or other waste excluded by the Agency in the 22    Agency's approval or any conditions contained in the 23    approval. A one-day household waste collection event may 24    accept controlled substances in accordance with federal 25    law.26        (2) Household waste must be accepted only from private   SB2852- 25 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    individuals. Waste must not be accepted from other 2    persons, including, but not limited to, owners and 3    operators of rented or leased residences where the 4    household waste was generated, commercial haulers, and 5    other commercial, industrial, agricultural, and government 6    operations or entities.7        (3) Household waste must be managed in a manner that 8    protects against releases of the waste, prevents 9    nuisances, and otherwise protects human health and the 10    environment. Household waste must also be properly secured 11    to prevent public access to the waste, including, but not 12    limited to, preventing access to the waste during the 13    event's non-business hours.14        (4) Management of the household waste must be limited 15    to the following: (i) acceptance of the waste, (ii) 16    temporary storage of the waste before transfer, and (iii) 17    off-site transfer of the waste or packaging for off-site 18    transfer.19        (5) Except as otherwise approved by the Agency, all 20    household waste received at the collection event must be 21    transferred off-site by the end of the day following the 22    collection event.23        (6) The transfer and ultimate disposition of household 24    waste received at the collection event must comply with 25    the Agency's approval, including all conditions contained 26    in the approval.  SB2852- 26 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    (d-5) One-day compostable waste collection event. To 2further aid in the collection and composting of compostable 3waste, as defined in subsection (b), a municipality may 4approve the operation of one-day compostable waste collection 5events at any site or facility within its territorial 6jurisdiction, and a county may approve the operation of 7one-day compostable waste collection events at any site or 8facility in any unincorporated area within its territorial 9jurisdiction. The approval granted under this subsection (d-5) 10must be in writing; must specify the date, location, and time 11of the event; and must list the types of compostable waste that 12will be collected at the event. If the one-day compostable 13waste collection event is to be operated at a location within a 14county with a population of more than 400,000 but less than 152,000,000 inhabitants, according to the 2010 decennial census, 16then the operator of the event shall, at least 30 days before 17the event, provide a copy of the approval to the recycling 18coordinator designated by that county. The approval granted 19under this subsection (d-5) may include conditions imposed by 20the county or municipality as necessary to protect public 21health and prevent odors, vectors, and other nuisances. A 22one-day compostable waste collection event approved under this 23subsection (d-5) must be operated in accordance with the 24approval, including all conditions contained in the approval. 25The following requirements shall apply to the one-day 26compostable waste collection event, in addition to the   SB2852- 27 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1conditions contained in the approval: 2        (1) Waste accepted at the event must be limited to the 3    types of compostable waste authorized to be accepted under 4    the approval.5        (2) Information promoting the event and signs at the 6    event must clearly indicate the types of compostable waste 7    approved for collection. To discourage the receipt of 8    other waste, information promoting the event and signs at 9    the event must also include:10            (A) examples of compostable waste being collected; 11        and12            (B) examples of waste that is not being collected.13        (3) Compostable waste must be accepted only from 14    private individuals. It may not be accepted from other 15    persons, including, but not limited to, owners and 16    operators of rented or leased residences where it was 17    generated, commercial haulers, and other commercial, 18    industrial, agricultural, and government operations or 19    entities.20        (4) Compostable waste must be managed in a manner that 21    protects against releases of the waste, prevents 22    nuisances, and otherwise protects human health and the 23    environment. Compostable waste must be properly secured to 24    prevent it from being accessed by the public at any time, 25    including, but not limited to, during the collection 26    event's non-operating hours. One-day compostable waste   SB2852- 28 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    collection events must be adequately supervised during 2    their operating hours.3        (5) Compostable waste must be secured in non-porous, 4    rigid, leak-proof containers that:5            (A) are covered, except when the compostable waste 6        is being added to or removed from the containers or it 7        is otherwise necessary to access the compostable 8        waste;9            (B) prevent precipitation from draining through 10        the compostable waste;11            (C) prevent dispersion of the compostable waste by 12        wind;13            (D) contain spills or releases that could create 14        nuisances or otherwise harm human health or the 15        environment;16            (E) limit access to the compostable waste by 17        vectors;18            (F) control odors and other nuisances; and19            (G) provide for storage, removal, and off-site 20        transfer of the compostable waste in a manner that 21        protects its ability to be composted.22        (6) No more than a total of 40 cubic yards of 23    compostable waste shall be located at the collection site 24    at any one time.25        (7) Management of the compostable waste must be 26    limited to the following: (A) acceptance, (B) temporary   SB2852- 29 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    storage before transfer, and (C) off-site transfer.2        (8) All compostable waste received at the event must 3    be transferred off-site to a permitted compost facility by 4    no later than 48 hours after the event ends or by the end 5    of the first business day after the event ends, whichever 6    is sooner.7        (9) If waste other than compostable waste is received 8    at the event, then that waste must be disposed of within 48 9    hours after the event ends or by the end of the first 10    business day after the event ends, whichever is sooner. 11    (d-6) Permanent compostable waste collection points. To 12further aid in the collection and composting of compostable 13waste, as defined in subsection (b), a municipality may 14approve the operation of permanent compostable waste 15collection points at any site or facility within its 16territorial jurisdiction, and a county may approve the 17operation of permanent compostable waste collection points at 18any site or facility in any unincorporated area within its 19territorial jurisdiction. The approval granted pursuant to 20this subsection (d-6) must be in writing; must specify the 21location, operating days, and operating hours of the 22collection point; must list the types of compostable waste 23that will be collected at the collection point; and must 24specify a term of not more than 365 calendar days during which 25the approval will be effective. In addition, if the permanent 26compostable waste collection point is to be operated at a   SB2852- 30 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1location within a county with a population of more than 2400,000 but less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, according to the 32010 federal decennial census, then the operator of the 4collection point shall, at least 30 days before the collection 5point begins operation, provide a copy of the approval to the 6recycling coordinator designated by that county. The approval 7may include conditions imposed by the county or municipality 8as necessary to protect public health and prevent odors, 9vectors, and other nuisances. A permanent compostable waste 10collection point approved pursuant to this subsection (d-6) 11must be operated in accordance with the approval, including 12all conditions contained in the approval. The following 13requirements apply to the permanent compostable waste 14collection point, in addition to the conditions contained in 15the approval: 16        (1) Waste accepted at the collection point must be 17    limited to the types of compostable waste authorized to be 18    accepted under the approval.19        (2) Information promoting the collection point and 20    signs at the collection point must clearly indicate the 21    types of compostable waste approved for collection. To 22    discourage the receipt of other waste, information 23    promoting the collection point and signs at the collection 24    point must also include (A) examples of compostable waste 25    being collected and (B) examples of waste that is not 26    being collected.  SB2852- 31 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (3) Compostable waste must be accepted only from 2    private individuals. It may not be accepted from other 3    persons, including, but not limited to, owners and 4    operators of rented or leased residences where it was 5    generated, commercial haulers, and other commercial, 6    industrial, agricultural, and government operations or 7    entities.8        (4) Compostable waste must be managed in a manner that 9    protects against releases of the waste, prevents 10    nuisances, and otherwise protects human health and the 11    environment. Compostable waste must be properly secured to 12    prevent it from being accessed by the public at any time, 13    including, but not limited to, during the collection 14    point's non-operating hours. Permanent compostable waste 15    collection points must be adequately supervised during 16    their operating hours.17        (5) Compostable waste must be secured in non-porous, 18    rigid, leak-proof containers that:19            (A) are no larger than 10 cubic yards in size;20            (B) are covered, except when the compostable waste 21        is being added to or removed from the container or it 22        is otherwise necessary to access the compostable 23        waste;24            (C) prevent precipitation from draining through 25        the compostable waste;26            (D) prevent dispersion of the compostable waste by   SB2852- 32 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        wind;2            (E) contain spills or releases that could create 3        nuisances or otherwise harm human health or the 4        environment;5            (F) limit access to the compostable waste by 6        vectors;7            (G) control odors and other nuisances; and8            (H) provide for storage, removal, and off-site 9        transfer of the compostable waste in a manner that 10        protects its ability to be composted.11        (6) No more than a total of 10 cubic yards of 12    compostable waste shall be located at the permanent 13    compostable waste collection site at any one time.14        (7) Management of the compostable waste must be 15    limited to the following: (A) acceptance, (B) temporary 16    storage before transfer, and (C) off-site transfer.17        (8) All compostable waste received at the permanent 18    compostable waste collection point must be transferred 19    off-site to a permitted compost facility not less 20    frequently than once every 7 days.21        (9) If a permanent compostable waste collection point 22    receives waste other than compostable waste, then that 23    waste must be disposed of not less frequently than once 24    every 7 days. 25    (e) The Agency may adopt rules governing the operation of 26household waste drop-off points, other than one-day household   SB2852- 33 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1waste collection events, one-day compostable waste collection 2events, and permanent compostable waste collection points. 3Those rules must be designed to protect against releases of 4waste to the environment, prevent nuisances, and otherwise 5protect human health and the environment. As necessary to 6address different circumstances, the regulations may contain 7different requirements for different types of household waste 8and different types of household waste drop-off points, and 9the regulations may modify the requirements set forth in 10subsection (c) of this Section. The regulations may include, 11but are not limited to, the following: (i) identification of 12additional types of household waste that can be collected at 13household waste drop-off points, (ii) identification of the 14different types of household wastes that can be received at 15different household waste drop-off points, (iii) the maximum 16amounts of each type of household waste that can be stored at 17household waste drop-off points at any one time, and (iv) the 18maximum time periods each type of household waste can be 19stored at household waste drop-off points.20    (f) Prohibitions.21        (1) Except as authorized in a permit issued by the 22    Agency, no person shall cause or allow the operation of a 23    household waste drop-off point, other than a one-day 24    household waste collection event, one-day compostable 25    waste collection event, or permanent compostable waste 26    collection point, in violation of this Section or any   SB2852- 34 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    regulations adopted under this Section.2        (2) No person shall cause or allow the operation of a 3    one-day household waste collection event in violation of 4    this Section or the Agency's approval issued under 5    subsection (d) of this Section, including all conditions 6    contained in the approval.7        (3) No person shall cause or allow the operation of a 8    one-day compostable waste collection event in violation of 9    this Section or the approval issued for the one-day 10    compostable waste collection event under subsection (d-5) 11    of this Section, including all conditions contained in the 12    approval.13        (4) No person shall cause or allow the operation of a 14    permanent compostable waste collection event in violation 15    of this Section or the approval issued for the permanent 16    compostable waste collection point under subsection (d-6) 17    of this Section, including all conditions contained in the 18    approval. 19    (g) Permit exemptions.20        (1) No permit is required under subdivision (d)(1) of 21    Section 21 of this Act for the operation of a household 22    waste drop-off point, other than a one-day household waste 23    collection event, one-day compostable waste collection 24    event, or permanent compostable waste collection point, if 25    the household waste drop-off point is operated in 26    accordance with this Section and all regulations adopted   SB2852- 35 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    under this Section.2        (2) No permit is required under subdivision (d)(1) of 3    Section 21 of this Act for the operation of a one-day 4    household waste collection event if the event is operated 5    in accordance with this Section and the Agency's approval 6    issued under subsection (d) of this Section, including all 7    conditions contained in the approval, or for the operation 8    of a household waste collection event by the Agency.9        (3) No permit is required under paragraph (1) of 10    subsection (d) of Section 21 of this Act for the operation 11    of a one-day compostable waste collection event if the 12    compostable waste collection event is operated in 13    accordance with this Section and the approval issued for 14    the compostable waste collection point under subsection 15    (d-5) of this Section, including all conditions contained 16    in the approval.17        (4) No permit is required under paragraph (1) of 18    subsection (d) of Section 21 of this Act for the operation 19    of a permanent compostable waste collection point if the 20    collection point is operated in accordance with this 21    Section and the approval issued for the compostable waste 22    collection event under subsection (d-6) of this Section, 23    including all conditions contained in the approval. 24    (h) This Section does not apply to the following:25        (1) Persons accepting household waste that they are 26    authorized to accept under a permit issued by the Agency.  SB2852- 36 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (2) Sites or facilities operated pursuant to an 2    intergovernmental agreement entered into with the Agency 3    under Section 22.16b(d) of this Act.4    (i) (Blank).5    (j) (Blank).6    (k) If an entity chooses to participate as a household 7waste drop-off point, then it must follow the provisions of 8this Section and any rules the Agency may adopt governing 9household waste drop-off points. 10    (l) (Blank). 11(Source: P.A. 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22.) 12    Section 10. The Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act is 13amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 14    (415 ILCS 15/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 5956)15    Sec. 6. Each county waste management plan adopted under 16Section 4 shall include a recycling program, and that . Such 17recycling program:18    (1) shall be implemented throughout the county and include 19a time schedule for implementation of the program; .20    (2) shall provide for the designation of a recycling 21coordinator to administer the program; .22    (3) shall be designed to recycle, by the end of the third 23and fifth years of the program, respectively 15% and 25% of the 24municipal waste generated in the county, subject to the   SB2852- 37 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1existence of a viable market for the recycled material, based 2on measurements of recycling and waste generated in terms of 3weight; the . The determination of recycling rate shall not 4include: discarded motor vehicles, wastes used for clean fill 5or erosion control, or commercial, institutional or industrial 6machinery or equipment; .7    (4) may provide for the construction and operation of one 8or more recycling centers by a unit of local government, or for 9contracting with other public or private entities for the 10operation of recycling centers; .11    (5) may require residents of the county to separate 12recyclable materials at the time of disposal or trash pick-up; 13.14    (6) may make special provision for commercial and 15institutional establishments that implement their own 16specialized recycling programs, provided that such 17establishments annually provide written documentation to the 18county of the total number of tons of material recycled; .19    (7) shall provide for separate collection and composting 20of leaves; .21    (8) shall include public education and notification 22programs to foster understanding of and encourage compliance 23with the recycling program; .24    (9) shall include provisions for compliance, including 25incentives and penalties; .26    (10) shall include provisions for (i) recycling the   SB2852- 38 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1collected materials, (ii) identifying potential markets for at 2least 3 recyclable materials, and (iii) promoting the use of 3products made from recovered or recycled materials among 4businesses, newspapers and local governments in the county; .5    (11) may provide for the payment of recycling diversion 6credits to public and private parties engaged in recycling 7activities; .8    (12) may describe, and quantify to the extent possible, 9residential and non-residential food waste collection 10programs, including residential programs that allow food waste 11collection service combined with landscape waste or 12segregated;13    (13) may require that residential or non-residential 14sources separate food waste from municipal waste at the time 15of disposal or trash pick-up; and16    (14) may evaluate markets for finished compost, encourage 17its use by units of local government, and quantify the volume 18or weight used to the extent possible. 19(Source: P.A. 86-777; 87-650.) 20    Section 15. The Illinois Solid Waste Management Act is 21amended by changing Section 2.1 and by adding Sections 11, 12, 2213, and 14 as follows: 23    (415 ILCS 20/2.1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 7052.1)24    Sec. 2.1. Definitions. When used in this Act, unless the   SB2852- 39 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1context otherwise requires, the following terms have the 2meanings ascribed to them in this Section:3    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency. 4    "Department", when a particular entity is not specified, 5means (i) in the case of a function to be performed on or after 6July 1, 1995 (the effective date of the Department of Natural 7Resources Act) and until the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Department of Commerce 9and Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity), as successor to the former Department of Energy 11and Natural Resources under the Department of Natural 12Resources Act; or (ii) in the case of a function required to be 13performed before July 1, 1995, the former Illinois Department 14of Energy and Natural Resources.15    "Deinked stock" means paper that has been processed to 16remove inks, clays, coatings, binders and other contaminants.17    "End product" means only those items that are designed to 18be used until disposal; items designed to be used in 19production of a subsequent item are excluded.20    "Food waste" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 21Section 3.197 of the Environmental Protection Act.22    "High grade printing and writing papers" includes offset 23printing paper, duplicator paper, writing paper (stationery), 24office paper, note pads, xerographic paper, envelopes, form 25bond including computer paper and carbonless forms, book 26papers, bond papers, ledger paper, book stock and cotton fiber   SB2852- 40 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1papers.2    "Paper and paper products" means high grade printing and 3writing papers, tissue products, newsprint, unbleached 4packaging and recycled paperboard.5    "Postconsumer material" means only those products 6generated by a business or consumer which have served their 7intended end uses, and which have been separated or diverted 8from solid waste; wastes generated during production of an end 9product are excluded.10    "Recovered paper material" means paper waste generated 11after the completion of the papermaking process, such as 12postconsumer materials, envelope cuttings, bindery trimmings, 13printing waste, cutting and other converting waste, butt 14rolls, and mill wrappers, obsolete inventories, and rejected 15unused stock. "Recovered paper material", however, does not 16include fibrous waste generated during the manufacturing 17process such as fibers recovered from waste water or trimmings 18of paper machine rolls (mill broke), or fibrous byproducts of 19harvesting, extraction or woodcutting processes, or forest 20residues such as bark.21    "Recycled paperboard" includes recycled paperboard 22products, folding cartons and pad backing.23    "Recycling" means the process by which solid waste is 24collected, separated and processed for reuse as either a raw 25material or a product which itself is subject to recycling, 26but does not include the combustion of waste for energy   SB2852- 41 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1recovery or volume reduction.2    "Tissue products" includes toilet tissue, paper towels, 3paper napkins, facial tissue, paper doilies, industrial 4wipers, paper bags and brown papers.5    "Unbleached packaging" includes corrugated and fiber 6boxes.7    "USEPA Guidelines for federal procurement" means all 8minimum recycled content standards recommended by the U.S. 9Environmental Protection Agency.10(Source: P.A. 102-444, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    (415 ILCS 20/11 new)12    Sec. 11. Food and food waste management hierarchy; 13diversion from landfill.14    (a) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of Section 2, it is the 15policy of the State for food and food waste collected under 16this Section to be managed according to the following food and 17food waste management hierarchy, which identifies the State's 18priorities for the management of food and food waste in the 19State:20        (1) The first priority is preventing or reducing the 21    amount of food and food waste that is discarded or 22    disposed of in the State.23        (2) The second priority is collecting and diverting 24    food that is safe for human consumption for reuse and 25    redistribution.  SB2852- 42 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (3) The third priority is collecting and diverting 2    food waste that is safe for consumption by animals, for 3    use in animal feed processes.4        (4) The fourth priority is collecting and managing 5    food waste that is unable to be used in the first, second, 6    or third priority, through a food waste processing 7    facility, composting, or anaerobic digestion.8    (b) A covered establishment, as defined in subsection (f), 9that meets the applicable regulatory threshold as determined 10in accordance with subsection (f) shall:11        (1) separate the food and food waste from other solid 12    waste;13        (2) manage the food and food waste in compliance with 14    State and local laws and rules applicable to its use in 15    accordance with subsection (a);16        (3) either (i) arrange for transfer of the food and 17    food waste to a location that manages food and food waste 18    in compliance with State and local laws and rules 19    applicable to its use in accordance with subsection (a) or 20    (ii) manage the food and food waste on-site in compliance 21    with State and local laws and rules applicable to its use 22    in accordance with subsection (a);23        (4) not directly dispose of more than an incidental 24    amount of food waste through the sewer system;25        (5) for non-residential properties, post instructions 26    for the separation of food and food waste from other   SB2852- 43 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    waste, and instructions for the further separation of the 2    food and food waste according to its end use pursuant to 3    subsection (a). The instructions must be posted in an area 4    where they are clearly visible to employees and 5    subcontractors managing food and food waste generated on 6    the property;7        (6) for non-residential properties provide, on at 8    least an annual basis, training opportunities for all 9    employees and subcontractors managing food and food waste 10    generated on the property and maintain proof of the 11    training being conducted for as long as the employee 12    remains employed and the subcontractor remains under 13    contract; and14        (7) submit a compliance report on an annual basis to 15    the Agency by April 1 for the previous calendar year that 16    includes but is not limited to: (i) the name of the 17    business, its physical location, and the phone number and 18    email address of an appropriate contact person; (ii) the 19    amount in tons or cubic yards of food or food waste that 20    was managed by each applicable part of the food waste 21    management hierarchy; and (iii) the name and physical 22    location of where the food or food waste was taken for each 23    applicable part of the food waste management hierarchy.24    (c) The Agency shall be responsible for enforcing the 25provisions of this Section and is authorized to adopt rules to 26implement this Section if it deems it necessary. A covered   SB2852- 44 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1establishment that violates any provision of this Section 2shall be liable for a civil penalty of $10,000 per violation. 3Any covered establishment that fails to pay a civil penalty 4under this Section shall be liable for a civil penalty of an 5additional $10,000 for failure to pay the civil penalty. The 6penalties provided in this Section may be recovered in a civil 7action brought in the name of the People of the State of 8Illinois by the State's Attorney of the county in which the 9violation occurred or by the Attorney General. Any penalties 10collected under this Section in an action in which the 11Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited into the 12Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 13with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 14Act.15    (d) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a 16county in which a violation occurs may institute a civil 17action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 18restrain violations under this Section or to require such 19actions as may be necessary to address violations of this 20Section. The penalties and injunctions provided in this 21Section are in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or 22other relief provided under any other State law. Nothing in 23this Section bars a cause of action by the State for any other 24penalty, injunction, or other relief provided by any other 25law.26    (e) Any covered establishment that knowingly makes a   SB2852- 45 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1false, fictitious, or fraudulent material statement, orally or 2in writing, to the Agency, related to or required by this 3Section or any rule adopted pursuant to this Section commits a 4Class 4 felony, and each such statement or writing shall be 5considered a separate Class 4 felony. A covered establishment 6who, after being convicted under this subsection, violates 7this subsection a second time or subsequent time commits a 8Class 3 felony.9    (f) As used in this Section:10    "Applicable regulatory threshold" means (i) beginning July 111, 2028, a covered establishment in a county with more than 12240,000 residents, according to the most recent federal 13decennial census, located at an establishment with floor area 14of more than 40,000 square feet, (ii) beginning July 1, 2029, a 15covered establishment in a county with more than 240,000 16residents, according to the most recent federal decennial 17census, located at an establishment with floor area of more 18than 20,000 square feet, (iii) beginning July 1, 2030, a 19covered establishment in a county with more than 240,000 20residents, according to the most recent federal decennial 21census, located at an establishment with floor area greater 22than 5,000 square feet, (iv) beginning July 1, 2031, a covered 23establishment in a county with more than 240,000 residents, 24according to the most recent federal decennial census, located 25at an establishment with floor area of more than 1,000 square 26feet, (v) beginning July 1, 2032, a covered establishment in a   SB2852- 46 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1county with more than 150,000 residents, according to the most 2recent federal decennial census, located at an establishment 3with floor area greater than 40,000 square feet, (vi) 4beginning July 1, 2033, a covered establishment in a county 5with more than 150,000 residents, according to the most recent 6federal decennial census, located at an establishment with 7floor area greater than 20,000 square feet, (vii) beginning 8July 1, 2034, a covered establishment in a county with more 9than 150,000 residents, according to the most recent federal 10decennial census, located at an establishment with floor area 11greater than 5,000 square feet, (viii) beginning July 1, 2035, 12a covered establishment in a county with more than 150,000 13residents, according to the most recent federal decennial 14census, located at an establishment with floor area greater 15than 1,000 square feet, and (ix) beginning July 1, 2036, a 16covered establishment with floor area greater than 20,000 17square feet in a county with 150,000 or fewer residents, 18according to the most recent federal decennial census, located 19within 20 miles of an Agency-permitted composting facility or 20anaerobic digester that accepts food waste.21    "Board" means the Pollution Control Board established 22under the Environmental Protection Act.23    "Covered establishment" means a commercial or 24institutional generator of food or food waste in the following 25business classifications: restaurants, grocery stores, food 26wholesalers, distributors and manufacturers, hotels,   SB2852- 47 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1hospitals, sports venues, event centers, caterers, nursing and 2residential care facilities, office buildings with dining 3services, food banks, colleges and universities with dining 4services, shopping centers with dining services, airports, 5golf and country clubs, and rental and shared use commercial 6kitchens. 7    (415 ILCS 20/12 new)8    Sec. 12. Diverting food that is safe for human 9consumption.10    (a) Any food that does not meet requirements for food 11safety, proper storage, food type, or any other specification 12established by a person that collects and redistributes food 13for human consumption may be refused by that person.14    (b) Any person that collects and redistributes food for 15human consumption may require that any entity donating food 16enter into a written contract that includes, but is not 17limited to, terms (i) addressing roles and responsibilities of 18the parties, (ii) assigning responsibility for costs related 19to food being donated that is not suitable for human 20consumption, (iii) a right to refuse food that is offered for 21human consumption, and (iv) compensation for accepting food 22that is suitable for human consumption.23    (c) Any person that donates food to a person that collects 24and redistributes food for human consumption shall not be 25compensated financially for donating the food.   SB2852- 48 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1    (415 ILCS 20/13 new)2    Sec. 13. Markets for compost and digestate. In order to 3expand the end use of compost and digestate in the State, the 4following requirements shall be met by State agencies and 5units of local government: 6        (1) a county with more than 150,000 residents, as of 7    the most recent federal decennial census, and the 8    municipalities within that county, shall jointly, on a 9    population pro rata basis, purchase and use 0.025 cubic 10    yards per resident per year, beginning July 1, 2033, of 11    compost and digestate on county and municipal related 12    projects, on privately funded projects in the county, or 13    given away, if within 50 miles of a composting or 14    anaerobic digestion facility that has a supply adequate to 15    meet the requirements of this paragraph.16        (2) the Department of Natural Resources shall purchase 17    and use 50,000 cubic yards in State fiscal year 2030, 18    100,000 cubic yards in State fiscal year 2031, 150,000 19    cubic yards in State fiscal year 2032, 200,000 cubic yards 20    in State fiscal year 2033, and 250,000 cubic yards in 21    State fiscal year 2034 and thereafter of compost and 22    digestate on State-owned and leased farmland, if within 50 23    miles of a composting or anaerobic digestion facility that 24    has a supply adequate to meet the requirements of this 25    paragraph;  SB2852- 49 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1        (3) the Department of Transportation shall purchase 2    and use 50,000 cubic yards in State fiscal year 2030, 3    100,000 cubic yards in State fiscal year 2031, 150,000 4    cubic yards in State fiscal year 2032, 200,000 cubic yards 5    in State fiscal year 2033, and 250,000 cubic yards in 6    State fiscal year 2034 and thereafter of compost and 7    digestate on State road building projects, if within 50 8    miles of a composting or anaerobic digestion facility that 9    has a supply adequate to meet the requirements of this 10    paragraph;11        (4) the Capital Development Board shall purchase and 12    use 10,000 cubic yards in State fiscal year 2030, 20,000 13    cubic yards in State fiscal year 2031, 30,000 cubic yards 14    in State fiscal year 2032, 40,000 cubic yards in State 15    fiscal year 2033 and 50,000 cubic yards in State fiscal 16    year 2034 and thereafter of compost and digestate on State 17    building projects, if within 50 miles of a composting or 18    anaerobic digestion facility that has a supply adequate to 19    meet the requirements of this paragraph; and 20    (415 ILCS 20/14 new)21    Sec. 14. Food diversion grant program. It is the 22responsibility of the State to assist in implementing this Act 23by supporting the development of the infrastructure needed to 24divert food and food waste from final disposal to the priority 25uses listed in the food waste management hierarchy. Grants   SB2852- 50 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1provided under this Section shall provide funding based on the 2following requirements: 3        (1) grants shall be made available on an annual basis 4    for State fiscal years 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2032 5    from the Solid Waste Management Fund in an amount not less 6    than $2,000,000 per fiscal year;7        (2) no single grant shall be less than $10,000 or 8    exceed $200,000;9        (3) grant recipients shall be limited to persons who 10    collect and redistribute food for human consumption, or 11    who own and operate an Agency-permitted composting or 12    anaerobic digestion facility.13    The Agency shall adopt rules implementing the grant 14program described in this Section.  15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.  SB2852- 51 -LRB104 17205 BDA 30625 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    415 ILCS 5/3.121 new4    415 ILCS 5/3.122 new5    415 ILCS 5/3.183 new6    415 ILCS 5/3.1977    415 ILCS 5/3.198 new8    415 ILCS 5/3.330was 415 ILCS 5/3.329    415 ILCS 5/22.22from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1022.2210    415 ILCS 5/22.22a new11    415 ILCS 5/22.3412    415 ILCS 5/22.5513    415 ILCS 15/6from Ch. 85, par. 595614    415 ILCS 20/2.1from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 7052.115    415 ILCS 20/11 new16    415 ILCS 20/12 new17    415 ILCS 20/13 new18    415 ILCS 20/14 new